Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 13 Rhode Island Code of Military Justice
30-13-77.
Principals.

Any person subject to this code who:

Commits an offense punishable by this code, or aids, abets, counsels, commands, or procures its commission; or

Causes an act to be done that if directly performed by that person would be punishable by this code; is a principal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-77

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-78.
Accessory after the fact.

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent the offender’s apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-78

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-79.
Lesser included offenses.

An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or an offense necessarily included therein.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-79

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-80.
Attempts.

An act done with specific intent to commit an offense under this code, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit that offense.

Any person subject to this code who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

Any person subject to this code may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-80

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-81.
Conspiracy.

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code shall, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-81

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-82.
Solicitation.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to desert in violation of §

30-13-85

or mutiny in violation of §

30-13-94

shall, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed or attempted, that person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to commit an act of misbehavior before the enemy in violation of §

30-13-99

of this code or sedition in violation of §

30-13-94

shall, if the offense solicited or advised is committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed, that person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-82

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-83.
Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person who:

Procures his or her own enlistment or appointment in the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

Procures his or her own separation from the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her eligibility for that separation;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-83

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-84.
Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in, or a separation from, the state military forces of any person, who is known to him or her to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-84

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-85.
Desertion.

Any member of the state military forces who:

Without authority goes or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away therefrom permanently;

Quits his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

Without being regularly separated from one of the state military forces enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of the state military forces, or in one of the armed forces of the United States, without fully disclosing the fact that he or she has not been regularly separated;

is guilty of desertion.

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces who, after tender of his or her resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his or her post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away therefrom permanently is guilty of desertion.

Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-85

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-86.
Absence without leave.

Any person subject to this code who, without authority:

Fails to go to his or her appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

Goes from that place; or

Absents himself or herself or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty at which he or she is required to be at the time prescribed;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-86

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-87.
Missing movement.

Any person subject to this code who, through neglect or design, misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which he or she is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-87

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-88.
Contempt towards officials.

Any person subject to this code who uses contemptuous words against the president, the governor of this state, or the governor of any other state, territory, commonwealth, or possession in which that person may be serving shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-88

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-89.
Disrespect towards superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect towards his or her superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-89

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-90.
Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who:

Strikes his or her superior commissioned officer, or draws or lifts up any weapon, or offers any violence against that officer while he or she is in the execution of his or her office; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his or her superior commissioned officer;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-90

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-91.
Insubordinate conduct toward warrant officer, non-commissioned officer, petty officer, or specialist.

Any warrant officer or enlisted member who:

Strikes or assaults a warrant officer, non-commissioned officer, petty officer, or specialist above the grade E-4 while that person is in the execution of his or her office;

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer, non-commissioned officer, petty officer, or specialist above the grade of E-4;

Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer, non-commissioned officer, petty officer, or specialist above the grade of E-4 while that person is in the execution of his or her office;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-91

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-92.
Failure to obey order or regulation — Derelict performance.

Any person subject to this code who:

Violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the state military forces that it is that person’s duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

Is derelict in the performance of his or her duties;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-92

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-93.
Cruelty and maltreatment.

Any person subject to this code who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to his or her orders shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-93

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-94.
Mutiny or sedition.

Any person subject to this code who:

With intent to usurp or override lawful military authority refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise do his or her duty or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty of mutiny;

With intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against that authority is guilty of sedition; or

Fails to do his or her utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in that person’s presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his or her superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which that person knows or has reason to believe is taking place, is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.

A person who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-94

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-95.
Resistance, breach of arrest, and escape.

Any person subject to this code who resists apprehension or breaks arrest or who escapes from physical restraint lawfully imposed shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-95

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-96.
Releasing prisoner without proper authority.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to that person’s charge, or who through neglect or design suffers that prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-96

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-97.
Unlawful detention of another.

Any person subject to this code who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-97

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-98.
Noncompliance with procedural rules.

Any person subject to this code who:

Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this code; or

Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this code regulating the proceedings before, during, or after the trial of an accused;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-98

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-99.
Misbehavior before the enemy.

Any person subject to this code who before or in the presence of the enemy:

Runs away;

Shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up any command, unit, place, or military property that it is his or her duty to defend;

Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military property that it is his or her duty to defend;

Casts away his or her arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Quits his or her place of duty to plunder or pillage;

Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the state military forces;

Willfully fails to do his or her utmost to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy any enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or any other thing, that it is his or her duty so to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces belonging to the United States or their allies, to the state, or to any other state, when engaged in battle;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-99

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-100.
Subordinate compelling surrender.

Any person subject to this code who compels, or attempts to compel, the commander of any of the state military forces of the state, or of any other state, to give the command up to an enemy or to abandon it, or who strikes the colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-100

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-101.
Improper use of countersign.

Any person subject to this code who, in time of war, discloses the parole or countersign to any person not entitled to receive it, or who gives to another who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign a different parole or countersign from that which, to his or her knowledge, he or she was authorized and required to give, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-101

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-102.
Forcing a safeguard.

Any person subject to this code who forces a safeguard shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-102

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-103.
Captured or abandoned property.

All persons subject to this code shall secure all public property taken from the enemy for the service of the United States, and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority, without delay, all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

Any person subject to this code who:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (a) of this section;

Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of captured or abandoned property, whereby that person receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or herself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself or herself; or

Engages in looting or pillaging;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-103

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-104.
Aiding the enemy.

Any person subject to this code who:

Aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

Without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects, or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with, or holds any intercourse with, the enemy, either directly or indirectly;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-104

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-105.
Misconduct of prisoner of war.

Any person subject to this code who, while in the hands of the enemy in time of war:

For the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his or her captors, acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation, to the detriment of others of whatever nationality held by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

While in a position of authority over other persons maltreats them without justifiable cause;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-105

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-106.
False official statements.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document, knowing it to be false, or makes any other false official statement knowing it to be false, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-106

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-107.
Military property — Loss, damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority:

Sells or otherwise disposes of;

Willfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses; or

Willfully or through neglect suffers to be damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of;

any military property of the United States, or of the state, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-107

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-108.
Property other than military property — Waste, spoilage, or destruction.

Any person subject to this code who, while in a duty status, willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States, or of the state, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-108

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-109.
Improper hazarding of vessel.

Any person subject to this code who willfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States, or of the state military forces, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States, or of the state military forces, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-109

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-110.
Drunken or reckless driving.

Any person subject to this code who operates any vehicle while drunk, or in a reckless or wanton manner, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-110

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-111.
Drunk on duty — Sleeping on post — Leaving post before relief.

Any person subject to this code who is found drunk on duty or sleeping upon his or her post, or who leaves his or her post before being regularly relieved, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-111

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-112.
Dueling.

Any person subject to this code who fights or promotes, or is concerned in or connives at fighting a duel, or who, having knowledge of a challenge sent or about to be sent, fails to report the fact promptly to the proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-112

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-113.
Malingering.

Any person subject to this code who for the purpose of avoiding work, duty, or service in the state military forces:

Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse, or derangement; or

Intentionally inflicts self-injury;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-113

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-114.
Riot or breach of peace.

Any person subject to this code who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-114

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-115.
Provoking speeches or gestures.

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures towards any other person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-115

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-116.
Perjury.

Any person subject to this code who, in a judicial proceeding or in a course of justice conducted under this code, willfully and corruptly gives, upon a lawful oath or in any form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, any false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry is guilty of perjury and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-116

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-117.
Frauds against government.

Any person subject to this code:

Who, knowing it to be false or fraudulent:

Makes any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof; or

Presents to any person in the civil, or military service thereof, for approval or payment any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof;

Who, for the purpose of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof:

Makes or uses any writing or other paper knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements;

Makes any oath to any fact or to any writing or other paper knowing the oath to be false; or

Forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper, or uses that signature knowing it to be forged or counterfeited;

Who, having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money, or other property, of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the state military forces, knowingly delivers to any person, having authority to receive it, any amount thereof less than that for which he or she receives a certificate or receipt; or

Who, being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the state military forces, makes or delivers to any person that writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the United States or the state;

shall, upon conviction, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-117

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-118.
Larceny and wrongful appropriation.

Any person subject to this code who wrongfully takes, obtains, or withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or of any other person any money, personal property, or article of value of any kind:

With intent permanently to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of that property or to appropriate it to his or her own use or the use of any person other than the owner, steals that property, is guilty of larceny; or

With intent temporarily to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of that property or to appropriate it to his or her own use or the use of any person other than the owner, is guilty of wrongful appropriation.

Any person found guilty of larceny or wrongful appropriation shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-118

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-119.
Unbecoming conduct.

Any commissioned officer who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman, or unbecoming an officer and a lady, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-119

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-120.
General disorders and neglect.

Though not specifically mentioned in this code, all disorders and neglects to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the state military forces, of which persons subject to this code may be guilty, shall be taken cognizance of by a general, special, or summary court-martial, according to the nature and degree of the offense, and shall be punished at the discretion of that court. However, cognizance may not be taken of, and jurisdiction may not be extended to, the crimes of murder, manslaughter, rape, robbery, maiming, sodomy, arson, extortion, assault, burglary, or housebreaking, jurisdiction of which is reserved to civil courts.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-120

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-121.
Courts of inquiry.

Courts of inquiry to investigate any matter may be convened by the governor or by any other person designated by the governor for that purpose, whether or not the persons involved have requested an inquiry.

A court of inquiry consists of three (3) or more commissioned officers. For each court of inquiry, the convening authority shall also appoint counsel for the court.

Any person subject to this code whose conduct is subject to inquiry shall be designated as a party. Any person subject to this code or employed in military or naval affairs of the state, who has a direct interest in the subject of inquiry, has the right to be designated as a party upon request to the court. Any person designated as a party shall be given due notice and has the right to be present, to be represented by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses, and to introduce evidence.

Members of a court of inquiry may be challenged by a party, but only for cause stated to the court.

The members, counsel, reporter, and interpreters of courts of inquiry shall take an oath or affirmation to faithfully perform their duties.

Witnesses may be summoned to appear and testify and be examined before courts of inquiry, as provided for courts-martial.

Courts of inquiry shall make findings of fact but may not express opinions or make recommendations unless required to do so by the convening authority.

Each court of inquiry shall keep a record of its proceedings that shall be authenticated by the signatures of the president and counsel for the court and forwarded to the convening authority. If the record cannot be authenticated by the president, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the president. If the record cannot be authenticated by counsel for the court, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of counsel.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-121

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-122.
Authority to administer oaths.

The following members of the state military forces may administer oaths for the purposes of military administration, including military justice, and affidavits may be taken for those purposes before persons having the general powers of a notary public:

The state judge advocate and all assistant state judge advocates;

All law specialists;

All summary courts-martial;

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting adjutants, and personnel adjutants;

All commanding officers of the naval militia;

All legal officers;

The president, law officer, trial counsel, and assistant trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial;

The president and counsel for the court of any court of inquiry;

All officers designated to take a deposition;

All persons detailed to conduct an investigation; and

All other persons designated by regulations of the governor.

Officers of the state military forces may not be authorized to administer oaths as provided in this section unless they are on active duty in or with those forces under orders of the governor as prescribed in this code.

The signature without seal of any above-mentioned person, together with the title of that person’s office, is prima facie evidence of his or her authority.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-122

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-123.
Provisions to be explained.

Sections

30-13-2

,

30-13-3

,

30-13-7

—

30-13-15

,

30-13-2

7,

30-13-29

,

30-13-40

,

30-13-58

,

30-13-76

—

30-13-118

, and

30-13-123

—

30-13-125

shall be carefully explained to every enlisted member at the time of that member’s enlistment or transfer or induction into, or at the time of his or her order to duty in or with, any of the state military forces or within thirty (30) days thereafter. They shall also be explained annually to each unit of the state military forces. A complete text of this code and of the regulations prescribed by the governor thereunder shall be made available to any member of the state military forces, upon his or her request, for his or her personal examination.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-123

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-124.
Complaints of wrongs.

Any member of the state military forces who believes himself or herself wronged by his or her commanding officer, and who, upon due application to that commanding officer, is refused redress, may complain to any superior commissioned officer, who shall forward the complaint to the governor or adjutant general.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-124

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-125.
Redress of injuries to property.

Whenever complaint is made to any commanding officer that willful damage has been done to the property of any person or that person’s property has been wrongfully taken by members of the state military forces, that officer may, subject to such regulations as the governor may prescribe, convene a board to investigate the complaint. The board shall consist of from one (1) to three (3) commissioned officers and, for the purpose of that investigation, it has power to summon witnesses and examine them upon oath or affirmation; to receive depositions or other documentary evidence; and to assess the damages sustained against the responsible parties. The assessment of damage made by the board is subject to the approval of the commanding officer, and in the amount so approved by the commanding officer, shall be charged against the pay of the offenders. The order of the commanding officer directing charges herein authorized is conclusive, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, on any disbursing officer for the payment by that officer to the injured parties of the damages so assessed and approved.

If the offenders cannot be ascertained, but the organization or detachment to which they belong is known, charges totaling the amount of damages assessed and approved may be paid to the injured parties from the military funds of the units of the state military forces to which the offenders belonged.

Any person subject to this code who is accused of causing willful damage to property has the right to be represented by counsel, to summon witnesses in his or her behalf, and to cross-examine those appearing against him or her. He or she has the right of appeal to the next higher commander.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-125

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-126.
Execution of processes and sentences.

In addition to the officers prescribed under the laws and regulations of the United States and in §

30-13-127(b)

, all processes and sentences of the military courts of the state military forces shall be directed to, and executed by, any deputy sheriff, town sergeant, constable, member of the state police, or member of the police department of any municipality, or any officer or enlisted person of the state military forces appointed by the court to serve or execute processes and sentences.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-126

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 59.

30-13-127.
Process of military courts.

Military courts may issue any process or mandate necessary to carry into effect their powers. A military court may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum and enforce by attachment attendance of witnesses and production of books, and records, when it is sitting within the state and the witnesses, books, and records sought are also so located.

Process and mandates may be issued by summary courts-martial, provost courts, or the president of other military courts and may be directed to, and may be executed by, the marshals of the military court or any peace officer and shall be in such form as may be prescribed by regulations issued under this code.

All officers to whom process or mandates may be so directed shall execute them and make return of their acts thereunder according to the requirements of those documents. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code, no officer may demand or require payment of any fee or charge for receiving, executing, or returning process or mandate or for any service in connection therewith.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-127

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-128.
Payment of fines and disposition thereof.

Fines imposed by a military court may be paid to it or to an officer executing its process. The amount of an imposed fine may be noted upon any state roll or account for pay of the delinquent and deducted from any pay or allowance due or thereafter to become due the delinquent, until the fine is liquidated. Any sum so deducted shall be returned to the military court that imposed the fine. Any military court and any officer collecting a fine or penalty imposed by a military court upon an officer or enlisted person shall pay it forthwith to the adjutant general who shall remit the sum within thirty (30) days to the state treasurer for the general purposes and uses of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-128

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-129.
Immunity for action of military courts.

No accused may bring an action or proceeding against the convening authority or a member of a military court, or officer or person acting under its authority or reviewing its proceedings, because of the approval, imposition, or execution of any sentence, or the imposition or collection of a fine or penalty, or the execution of any process or mandate of a military court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-129

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-130.
Presumption of jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the military courts and boards established by this code shall be presumed and the burden of proof rests on any person seeking to oust those courts or boards of jurisdiction in any action or proceeding.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-130

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-131.
Delegation of authority by governor.

The governor may delegate any authority vested in him or her under this code, and may provide for the subdelegation of any of that authority, except the power given him or her by §§

30-13-21

and

30-13-24

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-131

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-132.
Conformity to federal law.

The military courts of this state shall be constituted like, have cognizance of the same subjects as, and possess like powers as, except as to punishments, similar courts provided for by the laws and regulations governing the army of the United States and the proceedings of state military courts shall follow the forms and modes of procedure prescribed for similar federal military courts as far as applicable, except as otherwise provided in this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-132

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-133.
Expenses of courts.

The expenses incident to, and connected with, the holding of military courts and courts of inquiry shall be paid by the state under orders, rules, and regulations issued by the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-133

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-134.
Uniformity of law.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of this state, so far as practical, with the law of the United States.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-134

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-135.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Rhode Island Code of Military Justice”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-135

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.